Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 148 Parks and Tourism

148.001.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Parks;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of parks;

“Commission” means the State Property and Buildings Commission;

“Livestock” means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, alpacas, llamas, buffaloes, and any other animals of the bovine, ovine, porcine, caprine, equine, or camelid species;

“Prisoner of war” means any regularly appointed, enrolled, enlisted, or inducted member of the military forces of the United States who was captured, separated, and incarcerated by an enemy of the United States;

“Sanctuary” means a place of refuge where wildlife is maintained and protected from depredation and destruction; and

“Wildlife” means all living things that are neither human nor domesticated, including but not limited to mammals, reptiles, amphibians, birds, fishes, crustaceans, mollusks, trees, shrubs, vines, wildflowers, and nonflowering plants.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 1; 1972, ch. 189, § 1; 1988, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 2017 ch. 129, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

148.010.
Department of Parks may accept park property; title in state. [Repealed.]

148.011.
Department of Parks created — Commissioner — Appointment — Divisions.

There shall be established in the state government a Department of Parks, a statutory administrative department within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12, the executive head of which shall be the commissioner of parks.

The commissioner of parks shall be appointed by the Governor as provided in KRS 12.040 for the heads of statutory administrative departments and shall receive an annual salary not to exceed the amount provided in KRS 64.640(2) relating to compensation for the heads of other statutory administrative departments.

The commissioner of parks may establish divisions in accordance with the terms of KRS 12.050.

The heads of the divisions in the Department of Parks shall be appointed by the commissioner of parks in accordance with the provisions of KRS 12.050.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 2; 1980, ch. 188, § 109, effective July 15, 1980.

148.020.
Department may acquire, improve and operate parks; fees and charges. [Repealed.]

148.021.
Functions, powers, duties of department.

The Department of Parks shall exercise all administrative functions of the state relating to the operation of state parks, shrines, monuments, and museums except those allocated to the historical society.

The department may request acquisition, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 42, 45, 45A, 56, and the provisions made in this chapter, of lands by purchase, lease, or otherwise, on which to operate state parks.

The department may improve said parks by constructing and equipping improvements or facilities in said parks.

The department may operate said parks, fix fees and charges for the use of said parks and the improvements and facilities constructed therein, and provide for the collection of said fees and charges and the proper accounting therefor, except that:

The department shall not impose boat launching fees at any boat ramp over which it has authority and control; and

The department shall not allow, grant permission to, or permit any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other form of business arrangement to which the department has granted a rental or leasehold interest or has engaged to manage or operate facilities that include a public boat launching ramp, to charge a boat launching fee at any boat ramp.

The Department of Parks is authorized to enter into any agreement with the Breaks Interstate Park Commission for the operation of any facilities in the Breaks Interstate Park.

The Department of Parks is authorized to accept, for deposit in a trust and agency fund account in accordance with KRS 45.253, on behalf of the state any grant or contribution, federal or otherwise, to assist in meeting the cost of carrying out the functions assigned to the Department of Parks.

Notwithstanding any provision in KRS Chapter 41, 45, 45A, or 47 to the contrary, there may be established separate cash funds and depositories at each state park from which immediate payment of refunds may be made to a patron or guest of such state park of any unearned money advanced or paid by such guest or patron. The department may accept from a guest or patron an amount which includes the fee for the service rendered plus a gratuity for the waitress or other designated person and remit the gratuity directly from the depository or cash fund to the designated recipient thereof. Such funds or depositories shall be governed by regulations established by the Department of Parks and approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with provisions of KRS Chapter 13A in order to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 3; 1966, ch. 173; 1968, ch. 126, § 1; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1978, ch. 384, § 30, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 450, § 67, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 496, § 40, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 424, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2006, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

148.0211.
Resident veteran who was a prisoner of war exempt from camping fees.

Any veteran who has been a prisoner of war, was honorably discharged from the military forces, and is a resident of this state is exempt from camping fees in parks or campgrounds owned or operated by the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

To claim the exemption provided for by subsection (1) of this section, a veteran shall forward:

A copy of his separation form from military service; or

A letter from one (1) of the military forces or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; and

Written proof of residence to the Department of Parks. The department shall mail a card to the veteran certifying that he is exempt from the fees specified in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2017 ch. 42, § 5, effective June 29, 2017.

148.0212.
Permanently and totally resident veteran exempt from overnight accommodation rate at Kentucky state parks — Maximum number of stays — Peak periods — Administrative regulations.

A Kentucky resident shall be exempt from the relevant overnight accommodations rate at any Kentucky state park if he or she is:

A permanently and totally disabled veteran with a one hundred percent (100%) service-connected disability, regardless of wartime service; or

A permanently and totally disabled member of the Kentucky National Guard or Reserve Component injured while on state active duty, active duty training, or inactive duty training.

To be entitled to the exemption under this section, a veteran must be a Kentucky resident and must be rated one hundred percent (100%) permanently and totally disabled, as the result of an injury suffered while on active duty, by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the Department of Defense. Members of the Kentucky National Guard or Reserve Component must be rated one hundred percent (100%) permanently and totally disabled as provided in KRS Chapter 342.

The exemption shall be made available to qualified Kentucky residents as described in this section for a maximum of three (3) overnight stays per calendar year at any Kentucky state park. Each stay shall be limited to a maximum of three (3) days, subject to availability. During peak periods, as defined elsewhere in this section, stays are to be taken during the Sunday through Thursday five (5) day period only. Outside of peak periods, stays are available at any time.

The Department of Parks shall promulgate any administrative regulations necessary to carry out this section, including but not limited to:

Defining peak periods, which shall be no longer than the days between Memorial Day and Labor Day and the month of October;

Establishing the ten (10) day window during which reservations by residents under this section may be made;

Establishing those accommodations which qualify for the exemption; and

Delineating the types of proof acceptable for establishing eligibility for persons entitled to the exemption provided for in this section, while working in conjunction with the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The exemption described in this section shall not limit the benefits of a qualified Kentucky resident if he or she is also eligible for benefits under KRS 148.0211.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 3, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 42, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

148.022.
Outdoor recreation programs administered by Department for Local Government — Breaks Interstate Park functions.

The Department for Local Government shall administer and operate the outdoor recreation programs of the state and shall be responsible for developmental planning and the administration of United States Bureau of Outdoor Recreation funds.

All functions of the Commonwealth relating to the Breaks Interstate Park shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, C. § 1; 1982, ch. 396, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 424, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 48, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 69, § 60, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 15, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 47, § 75, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 16, § 16, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 117, § 72, effective July 15, 2010.

148.0221.
KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225.

As used in KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Authority” or “KMRRA” means the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority established in KRS 148.0222;

“Board” means the board of directors of KMRRA;

“County” means a county, charter county, urban-county government, unified local government, or consolidated local government;

“Kentucky Mountain Recreational Area” or “KMRA” means lands on which there is a system of recreational trails, including streams, rivers, and other waterways, and appurtenant facilities, including trailhead centers, parking areas, camping facilities, picnic areas, recreational areas, historic or cultural interpretive sites, and other facilities in Kentucky and designated by the KMRRA as a part of the KMRA;

“Land” means roads, water, watercourses, buildings, structures, and machinery or equipment thereon when attached to the realty;

“Landowner” means a tenant, lessee, occupant, or person in control of the premises;

“Participating county” means a county that has qualified under KRS 148.0222(5);

“Participating landowner” means a landowner who owns land in a participating county and has a contractual agreement with the KMRRA for trail development as part of the KMRA;

“Recreational purposes” means all-terrain vehicle riding, bicycling, canoeing, hiking, horseback riding, hunting, kayaking, motorcycle riding, rock climbing, fishing, swimming, archaeological activities, nature study, off-highway vehicle driving, pleasure driving, watersports, winter sports, visiting or viewing historical or scenic sites, and otherwise using land for purposes pertaining to recreation or trail activities; and

“Target county” means Bell, Boyd, Breathitt, Carter, Clay, Clinton, Elliott, Estill, Floyd, Greenup, Harlan, Jackson, Johnson, Knott, Knox, Laurel, Lawrence, Lee, Leslie, Letcher, Lewis, Madison, Magoffin, Martin, McCreary, Menifee, Morgan, Owsley, Perry, Pike, Powell, Pulaski, Rockcastle, Rowan, Wayne, Whitley, or Wolfe County.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 164, § 3, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 124, § 4, effective July 14, 2018; 2019 ch. 170, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

148.0222.
Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority — Creation — Status — Powers — Purpose — Governance — Operation — Membership — Employees.

The Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority is hereby created and established as an independent, de jure municipal corporation and political subdivision of the Commonwealth and shall exercise all of the powers that a corporation may lawfully exercise under the laws of the Commonwealth. The authority shall be a public body corporate and politic and an instrumentality of the Commonwealth, established with all the general corporate powers incidental thereto. The authority shall be attached to the Kentucky Department for Local Government for administrative purposes only. The authority shall be reauthorized for five (5) years from June 27, 2019, and may be renewed by the General Assembly. The authority may adopt bylaws and administrative regulations, subject to KRS Chapter 13A, for the orderly conduct of its affairs.

The purpose of the authority is to establish, maintain, and promote a recreational trail system throughout the KMRA to increase economic development, tourism, and outdoor recreation for residents and visitors. The recreational trail system shall be located with significant portions of the system situated on private property made available for use through lease, license, easement, or other appropriate legal form by willing landowners.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of representatives from participating counties and the Commonwealth as provided in this section.

The authority and board shall become operational when sixteen (16) target counties complete the requirements established by subsection (5)(a) of this section. When at least sixteen (16) target counties become participating counties, the commissioner of the Department for Local Government shall notify the county judge/executive of each of the participating counties, as well as the board members described in subsection (6) of this section, that the requirements have been met for the authority and board to become operational. The commissioner shall also establish a date, time, and place for an initial organizational meeting of the board, and shall serve as interim chair of the initial organizational meeting until such time as a chair is elected. The chair shall be a resident of a participating county.

Any target county may become a participating county upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the governing body of the county specifically approving the county’s participation in the KMRRA and submission of the adopted resolution or ordinance to:

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government if the resolution or ordinance is adopted prior to the KMRRA becoming operational pursuant to subsection (4) of this section; or

The KMRRA if the resolution or ordinance is adopted after KMRRA becomes operational.

The KMRRA board shall consist of the following members:

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources or his or her designee;

If an executive director of the authority has been employed under subsection (10) of this section, he or she shall serve as a nonvoting member, except in the event of a tie vote of the board;

One (1) representative selected for each of the nine (9) participating counties as provided in subsection (8) of this section, who shall be either:

The county judge/executive; or

The county judge/executive’s designee, who shall be an individual involved with economic development, tourism, recreation, or a related area within the county;

One (1) state Representative who is from the KMRRA region shall serve as a nonvoting member, appointed to a two (2) year term by the Speaker of the Kentucky House of Representatives, and shall not serve another term consecutively with a prior term; and

One (1) state Senator who is from the KMRRA region shall serve as a nonvoting member, appointed to a two (2) year term by the President of the Kentucky Senate, and shall not serve another term consecutively with a prior term.

The board membership of each county judge/executive or his or her designee shall:

Begin with the county judge/executive’s term of office; and

End with the county judge/executive’s term of office.

The twelve (12) voting members of the board shall be:
(8) (a)

The twelve (12) voting members of the board shall be:

The nine (9) county judges/executive, or their designees, from different KMRRA participating counties as described in subsection (6)(e) of this section;

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet or his or her designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee; and

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources or his or her designee.

The nine (9) initial county representatives shall be the county judges/executive of Breathitt, Martin, Perry, Knott, Leslie, Letcher, Pike, Magoffin, and Floyd Counties or their designees in that order. The first three (3) representatives listed shall serve a three (3) year term as voting members, the next three (3) representatives shall serve a two (2) year term as voting members, and the remaining three (3) representatives shall serve a one (1) year term as voting members.

After each term ends, the voting county representative shall be replaced by one (1) of the county judges/executive or his or her designee from one (1) of the target counties whose representative has not yet served as a voting member.

After the third year of operation, each new voting member shall serve a term of three (3) years, then step down and let a representative from the next county in line alphabetically whose representative has not served as a voting member take his or her place.

Once representatives from all participating counties within KMRA have each served one (1) term, the rotation shall begin again.

The board shall meet at least once annually to elect officers, establish a regular meeting schedule, and perform other duties as may be prescribed in the authority’s bylaws. The board chair may call special meetings at any time.
(9) (a)

The board shall meet at least once annually to elect officers, establish a regular meeting schedule, and perform other duties as may be prescribed in the authority’s bylaws. The board chair may call special meetings at any time.

Notice of each meeting shall be made both in writing and electronically and delivered to board members at least seven (7) days before the scheduled meeting date. Electronic mail alone is an acceptable form of notice of special meetings, so long as it is sent to directors at least seven (7) days before the scheduled meeting date.

Accommodations shall be made for remote attendance of each board meeting, whether regular or special, through means such as video conferencing, conference call, or similar services.

The presence of a majority of the total voting members of the KMRRA board, whether in person or remote, shall constitute a quorum. Vacant board positions shall be counted against the quorum total necessary for board action.

Board meetings shall be held exclusively within KMRRA participating counties, and each meeting shall be held in a different participating county until every participating county has hosted a meeting, at which time the cycle shall begin again.

The KMRRA board:

Shall elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and any other officers as established in the bylaws of the board;

May appoint temporary and standing committees to accomplish the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 and shall clearly describe the role, responsibilities, and tenure of each committee so created;

Shall adopt bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs and all other matters necessary to effect proper management and accountability of the board. The bylaws shall include, at a minimum, the following:

The powers and duties of the board’s members and the manner and number of officers to be elected from among the board members; and

The terms, conditions, and manner in which a board member will be removed;

Shall review and approve an annual budget;

Shall annually procure an audit of the authority’s financial systems, conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The Auditor of Public Accounts shall perform the audit. A copy of the audit shall be sent to the Legislative Research Commission and the Department for Local Government within ten (10) days of receipt by the board;

Shall ensure that all administrative costs for operating the authority are paid from funds accruing to the authority. The authority, its board, and its staff shall incur no liability or obligation beyond the extent to which revenues have been provided under KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225;

May seek administrative and management assistance through written agreement with state agencies, local area development districts, or local governing bodies until such time as the board has secured sufficient funding through grants, loans, fee systems, or any other funding source to hire staff; and

Shall employ an executive director to act as its chief executive officer to serve at its will and pleasure once it is financially possible to do so.

The executive director:

Shall be a person who is domiciled in a KMRRA participating county;

May, with permission of the board and approval of the commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee, employ any other hourly personnel considered necessary and retain temporary services. Pay raises for any personnel shall require approval of the board and the commissioner of the Department for Local Government or his or her designee;

Shall carry out plans to implement KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 and to exercise those powers enumerated in the bylaws of the board;

Shall, along with any staff with responsibilities so delegated by the executive director, ensure that all minutes, records, and orders of the authority and its board are complete and available for public inspection, if necessary;

Shall prepare narrative and financial reports of the authority’s fiscal obligations and submit these reports to the board at regularly scheduled meetings or as otherwise directed; and

May cast a tiebreaking vote in board decisions, but shall not be permitted to cast a vote under any other circumstances. Until such time as an executive director is hired, the chairperson of the board shall make the final determination in the event of a tie vote of the board.

The executive director, all full-time or part-time personnel, all seasonal employees, and all contractual employees, if any, shall be paid from funds accruing to the authority and authorized in a budget approved by the board, unless the Department for Local Government has temporarily taken on the responsibility of paying any of those employees.

Board members shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations. Board members may have their lodging reimbursed by KMRRA. Any reimbursement requests exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) per person shall be submitted to the Department for Local Government for approval.

If a county judge/executive ceases to serve as the county judge/executive prior to the end of his or her term, he or she shall be removed from the board, and his or her replacement as county judge/executive shall serve on the board for the remainder of the term.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 164, § 4, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 170, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

148.0223.
Duties of authority — Prioritizing contractual obligations — Authorized functions — No waiver of sovereign immunity.

The KMRRA shall:

Supervise the design and construction of trail systems within the KMRA and provide all management functions for the trails and for any other property built, acquired, or leased pursuant to its powers under KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225;

Construct, develop, manage, maintain, operate, improve, renovate, finance, or otherwise provide for recreational and trail-related activities and facilities on designated public lands and private lands of participating landowners who have voluntarily entered into use agreements with the board;

Promote the growth and development of the trail system, tourism, and the hotel, restaurant, and entertainment industry within the KMRA and the Commonwealth, through marketing KMRA to enhance local economic and tourism development;

Establish agreements with other persons, businesses, agencies, organizations, or any other entity to levy a surcharge on tickets for events, activities, festivals, or functions that are cosponsored with other entities and contribute to the authority’s operating revenue; and

Procure insurance against any losses in connection with its property, licenses, easements, or contracts, including hold-harmless agreements, operations, or assets in such amounts and from such insurers as the board considers desirable.

The board’s management program shall prioritize contractual arrangements with private landowners to use land for recreational purposes, which shall not diminish the participating landowner’s interest, control, or profitability of the land. If necessary to implement a comprehensive trail system, the board may also contract with public landowners through contractual agreements that recognize the primary mission for which the public entity controls and manages the land.

The board may carry out any of the following to accomplish the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225:

Acquire, own, and hold property, and all interests therein, by deed, purchase, gift, devise, bequest, or lease, or by transfer from the State Property and Buildings Commission, except that the authority shall not acquire property through the exercise of the power of eminent domain;

Dispose of any property acquired in any manner provided by law;

Lease property, whether as lessee or lessor, and acquire or grant through easement, license, or other appropriate legal form, the right to develop and use property and open it to the use of the public;

Mortgage or otherwise grant security interests in its property;

Maintain sinking funds and reserves as the board determines appropriate for the purposes of meeting future monetary obligations and needs of the authority; however, contributions to a sinking fund during a fiscal year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior year;

Sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in any court;

Make contracts and execute instruments necessary for carrying on its business, including contracts with any Kentucky state agency, the federal government, or any person, individual, partnership, or corporation to effect any or all of the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225, as follows:

Contracts shall go through a public bidding process;

Contracts for one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more shall be sent, with at least three (3) bids from separate entities, to the Department for Local Government for review and final approval;

Bids from entities within KMRRA participating counties are to be given preference over competing bidders from outside of KMRRA participating counties; and

If the Department for Local Government has not given a response in the form of an approval or rejection after five (5) business days from the date the department received the contract to be reviewed, it shall be considered approved;

Accept grants and loans from and enter into contracts and other transactions with any federal agency, regional commission, or state agency for accomplishing the purposes of KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225;

Borrow money and issue bonds, security interests, or notes;

Provide for and secure the payment of the bonds, security interests, or notes;

Provide for the rights of the holders of the bonds, security interests, or notes;

Purchase, hold, and dispose of any of its bonds, security interests, or notes;

Accept gifts or grants of property, security interests, money, labor, supplies, or services from any governmental unit or from any person, firm, or corporation;

Establish a regional recreational trail system based upon contracts and agreements with participating landowners. The board may enter into contracts with landowners, and other persons holding an interest in the land being used for its recreational facilities, to hold those landowners harmless with respect to any claim in tort growing out of the use of the land for public recreation or growing out of the recreational activities operated or managed by the board from any claim, except a claim for damages proximately caused by the willful or malicious conduct of the landowner or any of his or her agents or employees;

Establish a fee-based system of permits, user registrations, or other trail or facility access mechanisms.
(o) 1.

Establish a fee-based system of permits, user registrations, or other trail or facility access mechanisms.

The fees may be imposed for access to and use of the trails, parking facilities, visitor centers, or other trail-related recreational purpose facilities or recreation activities that are part of the KMRA or as an admission to an event.

The fees shall be decided by the board.

The KMRRA shall retain and use the revenue from fees for any purposes consistent with KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 and within the guidelines in subsection (4) of this section;

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to govern use and maintenance of the KMRA and any other matters for effective management of the KMRA;

Cooperate and contract with the regional recreation authorities of Tennessee, Virginia, West Virginia, and other contiguous states to connect the trails in Kentucky with similar recreation facilities in those states; and

Exercise all of the powers that a corporation may lawfully exercise under the laws of the Commonwealth.

The fees collected by the KMRRA are to be used within the following guidelines:

To pay the salary of the executive director and all staff of the KMRRA;

To reimburse travel expenses of board members including lodging, subject to Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations;

To fund the construction, maintenance, and all necessary expenses of the KMRRA trail system;

To maintain a sinking fund with contributions to the fund during a fiscal year not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the total fees collected during the prior year and the total fund not to exceed a balance of one million dollars ($1,000,000) at the end of any fiscal year; and

Any remaining moneys not already appropriated in accordance with KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 at the end of the fiscal year are to be sent to the Department for Local Government to be placed into an account to be used exclusively for economic development grants in KMRRA participating counties. These grants shall give preference to projects in economically distressed counties, then to at-risk counties, and then to transitional counties, as defined by the Appalachian Regional Commission.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as a waiver of sovereign immunity.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 164, § 5, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 170, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

148.0224.
Revenue bonds and revenue refunding bonds.

Revenue bonds and revenue refunding bonds of the authority issued under KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 do not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth or a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision, but the bonds shall be payable solely from the funds provided for in KRS 148.0221 to 148.0225 from revenues resulting from the issuance of bonds.

All bonds shall contain on the face of the bond a statement to the effect that neither the Commonwealth nor any political subdivision of the Commonwealth is obligated to pay the bond or the interest on the bond, except from revenues of the recreational project or projects for which they are issued, and that neither the faith or credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth is pledged to the payment of the principal or the interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 164, § 6, effective June 29, 2017.

148.0225.
No waiver of landowner protections of KRS 411.190.

A participating landowner who has a contractual agreement with the KMRRA for use of private land as part of the KMRA does not waive any protection granted to the landowner by KRS 411.190.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 164, § 7, effective June 29, 2017.

148.026.
Employees — Contract for services.

The commissioner of parks may employ or contract with such other persons, firms or corporations as he may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish the duties and functions assigned by law to the Department of Parks; may fix the compensation and the terms of employment or contract of those employed or contracted with; and may assign to them such duties and responsibilities as he may determine; provided, however, that any contract shall be approved by the Finance and Administration Cabinet before it shall become effective. Individuals employed by the commissioner of parks on a temporary basis for specific construction projects under KRS 56.491(5) or for maintenance projects shall be exempt from the requirements of KRS 18A.005 to 18A.200.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 7; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 9(2); 1980, ch. 331, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 448, § 68, effective July 15, 1982.

148.028.
Determination of need for state park — Request for acquisition.

The Department of Parks, may, through its commissioner, determine the need for lands or waters, or any interest or estate therein, located in Kentucky, having scenic beauty, material or recreational utility, historic interest, natural phenomena or other unusual features which should be acquired, preserved and maintained as a part of the state park system of Kentucky. If a determination is made that any such property or interest therein should be acquired for use in the state park system, the finding of such determination by the commissioner of parks shall be conveyed in writing to the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Such written notification shall apprise the Finance and Administration Cabinet of the interest sought to be acquired and shall serve as a request that the Finance and Administration Cabinet proceed, pursuant to the powers vested in the Finance and Administration Cabinet by KRS Chapters 42, 45 and 56, to acquire the property or interest therein sought for use of the Department of Parks.

History.
Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 126, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

148.029.
Recreation areas designated wildlife sanctuaries — Wildlife protected — Permits for scientific collecting — Duties of department.

All areas controlled by the Department of Parks and designated as camping, hiking, or other family-oriented recreation areas are designated wildlife sanctuaries for the purpose of affording protection to the wildlife thereon as natural, integrated, interrelated, ecological communities.

No unauthorized person shall enter a wildlife sanctuary and take, damage, injure, kill, destroy, or unduly disturb the wildlife therein except as provided in this section.

The department may issue to any person a permit for the scientific collection of wildlife provided the applicant for such permit holds a current state scientific collecting permit issued by the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

This section does not apply to fish taken pursuant to KRS Chapter 150 and all rules and regulations promulgated by the Department of Parks and the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources.

The department may authorize the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources to administer a wildlife management plan that may include the implementation of any management method provided in KRS Chapter 150 in the course of operating and administering the parks; and in so doing shall consider the ecological impact on the sanctuary as a whole.

History.
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 189, § 2(1) to (5); 2000, ch. 87, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

148.030.
Financing acquisition and improvement of parks; revenue bonds; uniting parks in one bond issue; operating expenses; operation by management corporation. [Repealed.]

148.031.
Manner of payment of cost of acquisition and construction — Revenue bonds.

The cost of acquiring parks and constructing improvements and facilities therein and equipping same may be defrayed by funds received from general expenditure fund appropriations, gifts, the use of money received as fees and charges for the use of said parks and facilities, or by the issuance of revenue bonds, or by a combination of such sources of funds.

In the event revenue bonds are issued to defray all or any part of such costs, said revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the terms of KRS 58.010 to 58.140.

The Department of Parks may unite into one (1) project for financing purposes all or as many parks, and the improvements therein, or to be constructed, enlarged or improved, as it deems practicable, so that the fees and charges and other revenue or receipts from every source whatsoever from the parks thus united shall be used for the payment of the principal and interest of all bonds which may be issued. Such united receipts shall continue until all bonds issued have been paid in full. The lien of the bonds for such united project shall be a lien upon the gross income and revenue of all parks thus united into a project.

All parks in which improvements and facilities are constructed and equipped by the issuance of revenue bonds shall be maintained and operated by the Department of Parks until the bonds are paid, and the cost of operation and maintenance shall be paid out of appropriations and receipts received by the Department of Parks.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 11.

148.040.
Regulations for parks; accounting system. [Repealed.]

148.041.
Regulations — Accounting system.

The department shall adopt regulations necessary for the operation, maintenance and use of state parks. These regulations shall include the setting up of an accounting system to properly show the receipts and expenditures of the parks operated by the department, and shall provide for the setting aside and pledging of sufficient revenue to secure the payment of all bonds and the interest thereon which may be issued.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 4.

148.050.
Rules to be posted and obeyed. [Repealed.]

148.051.
Regulations to be posted.

All regulations adopted by the department for the purpose of protecting and maintaining the property under the control of the department and devoted to public park purposes, shall be printed and posted at the main entrance to the parks and at three (3) or more public places within the park.

All persons using, occupying or going upon any property held by or controlled by the Department of Parks shall comply with all the regulations made by the department.

History.
Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 157, § 5.

148.055.
Commissioning park custodians and employes as peace officers. [Repealed.]